Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20183-146
Division; rentals; power to determine; charges; lien; enforce.

The division may determine the charges or rental for the use of any properties and the charges for any service or accommodations under its control and the terms and conditions under which such properties may be used, so long as in all cases the public shall not be deprived of its rightful, equal, and uniform use of such property. Charges shall be reasonable and uniform for the same class of service and established with due regard to the property and improvements used and the expenses of operation to the state. To enforce the payment of charges, the state shall have a lien which the division may enforce, substantially as is provided by law for liens and the enforcement thereof, for repairs to or the improvement, storage, or care of any personal property.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 11(6), p. 98;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 39.